Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE A. DRAINAGE DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 6612. CAMERON COUNTY DRAINAGE DISTRICT NO. 1

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 6612.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the board of directors of the district.

(2) "Commissioners court" means the Cameron County Commissioners Court.

(3) "Director" means a member of the board.

(4) "District" means the Cameron County Drainage District No. 1.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2017.

Sec. 6612.002. NATURE OF DISTRICT. The district is a conservation and reclamation district in Cameron County created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution, for all purposes of that section, including the reclamation and drainage of its seeped, salty, waterlogged, and overflowed land and other land needing drainage.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2017.

Sec. 6612.003. FINDINGS OF BENEFIT AND PUBLIC PURPOSE. (a) The conversion of the district into a conservation and reclamation district under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution, and the provision to the district of the powers conferred by that section:

(1) will benefit the residents and property in the district; and

(2) benefit all property included in the district.

(b) No property which is benefited is not included in the district.

(c) The district is essential to accomplish the purposes of Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2017.

Sec. 6612.004. DISTRICT TERRITORY. The district is composed of the territory described by Section 1, Chapter 145, Acts of the 41st Legislature, Regular Session, 1929, as that territory may have been modified under:

(1) Subchapter I, Chapter 56, Water Code, before September 1, 1995;

(2) Subchapter J, Chapter 56, Water Code;

(3) Subchapter J, Chapter 49, Water Code; or

(4) other law.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER B. BOARD OF DIRECTORS

Sec. 6612.051. COMPOSITION OF BOARD. The board consists of three directors appointed by the commissioners court.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER C. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 6612.101. GENERAL POWERS AND DUTIES. (a) The district has the:

(1) rights, powers, functions, and privileges provided to a conservation and reclamation district by the Texas Constitution and general law;

(2) rights, powers, privileges, and duties provided to a drainage district created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution, and organized under general law, including Chapters 49 and 56, Water Code; and

(3) powers of government and the authority to exercise the rights, privileges, and functions conferred by this chapter.

(b) The district has the right and power of a drainage district organized under Chapter 56, Water Code, to impose taxes and issue bonds.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2017.